Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-307
Zoning regulations;
adoption; notice; hearing.

No airport zoning regulations
shall be adopted, amended, or changed under the
Airport Zoning Act except by the action of the legislative body
of the political subdivision in question, or the joint airport zoning board provided for in section
3-304, after a public hearing in relation thereto, at which parties in interest
and citizens shall have an opportunity to be heard. At least ten days'
notice of the hearing shall be published in an official paper, or a paper
of general circulation, in the political subdivision or subdivisions in which the airport hazard
area is located.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 5(1), p. 684;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 7.